Hawaii statutes.
§323D-82 Maintenance of services. A
person who has acquired or is engaged in the acquisition of a hospital shall
not substantially reduce or eliminate direct patient care services at the
hospital below the levels at which those services were available at the time of
the acquisition, without first giving written notice of the planned reduction
or elimination to the agency and receiving the agency's approval, prior to
implementing the reduction or elimination of services. [L 1998, c 257, pt of
§1; am L 1999, c 18, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next